Maryland, session 2025, HB0105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
3–601.
(a) In order to utilize to the greatest extent possible the benefits of available
financial resources relating to transportation purposes, including federal grants, loans,
transportation facility revenue sources, and other programs, the Department from time to
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0105*

HOUSE BILL 105
time may issue its bonds and otherwise borrow funds, as provided in this subtitle, to finance
the costs of transportation facilities.
(d) If the Department intends to pledge any future federal aid from any source to
support repayment of bonds issued under this subtitle:
(1) The aggregate outstanding and unpaid principal amount of debt issued
under this subtitle or Title 4, Subtitle 3 of this article that is secured by a pledge of future
federal aid may not exceed $1,000,000,000 as of June 30 of any fiscal year, provided that
the proceeds may be used only for:
(i) Designing and constructing the Baltimore Red Line;
(ii) Procuring zero–emission buses consistent with § 7–406 of [the
Transportation Article] THIS ARTICLE and constructing related infrastructure, including
bus maintenance facilities;
(iii) Developing and constructing the Southern Maryland Rapid
Transit Corridor;
(iv) Designing and constructing improvements to the Maryland
Route 2 and Route 4 corridor, including the Thomas Johnson Bridge;
(v) Designing and constructing improvements to the Maryland
Route 90 corridor; [or]
(vi) REPLACING LIGHT RAIL TRANSIT VEHICLES AND COSTS
RELATED TO THE REPLACEMENT OF THE VEHICLES; OR
(VII) Designing and constructing improvements to the Interstate 81
corridor;
(2) The date of maturity may not be later than 15 years after the date of
issue; and
(3) No part of the tax levied under § 3–215 of this title may be repealed,
diminished, or applied to any other purpose until:
(i) The bonds issued under this subtitle and interest on them have
become due and fully paid; or
(ii) Adequate and complete provision for payment of the principal
and interest has been made.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.